Maryland, session 2025, HB0777.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Procedure
10–101.1.
A PERSON WHO IS GRANTED AN EXPUNGEMENT UNDER THIS SUBTITLE SHALL
BE DETERMINED FOR ALL PURPOSES NOT TO HAVE BEEN ARRESTED FOR, CITED
FOR, CHARGED WITH, OR CONVICTED OF THE UNDERLYING OFFENSE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0777*